Utah statutes.
79-3-504.   Revocation or suspension of permits -- Criminal penalties.

(1)  A permitting agency under Section 79-3-501 or 79-3-502 may revoke or suspend a permit if the permittee fails to conduct the excavation pursuant to the law, the rules enacted by the permitting agency, or permit provisions.

(2) (a)  A person violating any provision of Section 79-3-501 or 79-3-502 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  A person convicted of violating any provision of Section 79-3-501 or 79-3-502, or the rules promulgated by the survey or the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration under those sections, shall forfeit to the state or the respective trust all paleontological resources discovered by or through the person's efforts, in addition to any penalties imposed.

